Hawaii statutes.
[PART
II.] UNCLAIMED PROPERTY HELD BY THE UNITED STATES

[§523A-51] Declaration of policy. It
is the policy of this State to discover property in the custody of officers,
departments, and agencies of the United States, which property is unclaimed or
abandoned by owners whose addresses are known or presumed to be in this State.
[L 1988, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next